Illinois, session 104th, HB5780.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Labor 5Compliance Disclosure for Health Care Facilities Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings.7    (a) This State provides financial assistance, including 8State-supported bonds and financing approvals, for health care 9facilities and related services.10    (b) Compliance with State and federal labor laws is a 11material indicator of an applicant's operational integrity, 12financial stewardship, and ability to safely and sustainably 13deliver health care services.14    (c) Transparency regarding labor law compliance promotes 15responsible use of public resources and protects workers, 16patients, and taxpayers.17    (d) Requiring disclosure of labor violations as part of 18the Health Facilities and Services Review Board and the 19Illinois Finance Authority approval process is necessary to 20ensure informed decision making when public financing is 21involved. 22    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:  HB5780- 2 -LRB104 21861 SPS 37684 b1    "Applicant" means any entity seeking approval from the 2Health Facilities and Services Review Board and the Illinois 3Finance Authority for State-supported bonds, certificates of 4need involving public financing, or other State-authorized 5debt instruments for a health care facility or related 6project.7    "Final determination" includes administrative orders, 8court judgments, or settlement agreements where liability was 9admitted, found, or resolved.10    "Labor violation" means any final or pending 11determination, judgment, citation, or settlement within the 12preceding 5 years involving State or federal laws concerning: 13(i) wages and hours; (ii) occupational safety and health; 14(iii) collective bargaining or labor relations; (iv) worker 15misclassification; and (v) anti-retaliation or unfair labor 16practices. 17    Section 15. Mandatory labor violation disclosure.18    (a) As a condition of approval by the Health Facilities 19and Services Review Board and the Illinois Finance Authority 20for any project involving State-supported bonds or financing, 21each applicant shall submit a labor compliance disclosure 22statement that includes:23        (1) a list of all labor violations incurred by the 24    applicant, its parent entities, subsidiaries, or 25    controlling affiliates during the preceding 5 years;  HB5780- 3 -LRB104 21861 SPS 37684 b1        (2) the issuing agency or court;2        (3) the date and nature of each violation;3        (4) any penalties assessed or remedies ordered; and4        (5) the current compliance status and corrective 5    actions taken.6    (b) An applicant shall certify under penalty of perjury 7that the disclosure required under subsection (a) is complete 8and accurate. 9    Section 20. Review and consideration by the Board and 10Authority.11    (a) The Health Facilities and Services Review Board and 12the Illinois Finance Authority shall consider disclosed labor 13violations as part of their assessment of: (i) financial 14feasibility; (ii) management capability; and (iii) public 15interest and community impact.16    (b) The existence of labor violations shall not 17automatically disqualify an applicant. If disclosed labor 18violations, pending labor proceedings, or unresolved labor 19compliance issues demonstrate systematic noncompliance or 20material risk to the public interest, the Health Facilities 21and Services Review Board and the Illinois Finance Authority 22may: (i) delay approval until the matter is resolved or the 23applicant demonstrates adequate corrective action; (ii) impose 24conditions on approval; (iii) require additional reporting or 25monitoring; or (iv) deny approval.  HB5780- 4 -LRB104 21861 SPS 37684 b1    (c) If a conditional approval is issued, the Health 2Facilities and Services Review Board and the Illinois Finance 3Authority shall identify the specific conditions imposed, the 4deadline for compliance, and the consequences for 5noncompliance. The failure to comply with any condition of the 6approval may result in the suspension, revocation, or denial 7of the approval, ineligibility for State-supported financing, 8or civil penalties under Section 30. 9    Section 25. Verification and interagency coordination.10    (a) If disclosures involve a pending proceeding, repeated 11violations, or proposed conditional approval, the Health 12Facilities and Services Review Board and the Illinois Finance 13Authority shall verify the disclosures through coordination 14with: (i) the Department of Labor; (ii) the Attorney General; 15(iii) the Department of Public Health; and (iv) any relevant 16federal labor agencies.17    (b) The Health Facilities and Services Review Board and 18the Illinois Finance Authority may adopt rules to establish 19verification procedures. 20    Section 30. Penalties for non-disclosure or 21misrepresentation. An applicant that knowingly fails to 22disclose a labor violation or submits materially false 23information shall be subject to:24        (1) denial or revocation of Board approval;  HB5780- 5 -LRB104 21861 SPS 37684 b1        (2) ineligibility for State-supported bonds for up to 2    5 years; and3        (3) civil penalties not to exceed $50,000 per 4    violation. 5    Section 35. Rulemaking. The Health Facilities and Services 6Review Board and the Illinois Finance Authority shall adopt 7rules necessary to implement and administer this Act no later 8than 90 days after the effective date of this Act.